Utah statutes.
48-2a-203 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Voluntary cancellation of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership shall be canceled upon the dissolution and the completion of winding up of the partnership or at any other time there are no limited partners.  A certificate of cancellation shall be filed with the division and shall set forth:

(1)  the name of the limited partnership;

(2)  the date of filing of its certificate of limited partnership;

(3)  the reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

(4)  the effective date of cancellation, which shall be a date certain, if the cancellation is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

(5)  any other information the general partners filing the certificate determine.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

